Massachusetts, session 194th, H3071.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the  
following new chapter: 
1.) An Act to improve the fairness of sales tax collections, and revenue sources of The 
Commonwealth of Massachusetts.  
2.) All Lottery Tickets sold by the Massachusetts State Lottery, and/or in multi-state 
agreement, in relation to other Lottery Pools, shall have normal sales taxes applied to the 
transactions, as would be the case with other goods and services, in The Commonwealth of 
Massachusetts. 
3.) These provisions, are adopted, for the purposes of consistency, of commercial 
transactions across the Commonwealth. They also recognize that there exists some degree of 
inequality, and unfairness, if significant retail transactions, do not collect uniform sales tax 
revenue, at the point of sale, and/or other transaction.  

of 2 13  4.) In the context, of significant, and substantial reductions in funding, in the event of 
public emergencies, and in the reality of successful state lottery operations, there is no longer a 
need to provide promotional advantage, or incentive, to a discretionary commercial activity, that 
is an established part of the economy. 
5.) It is in the interests of public policy, that a discretionary activity, that is effectively, of 
some economically regressive aspect, not receive any preferential public government advantage.